Texas statutes.
LABOR CODE

TITLE 2. PROTECTION OF LABORERS

SUBTITLE C. WAGES

CHAPTER 63. ACTION ON ASSIGNMENT OF WAGES

Sec. 63.001. ASSIGNMENT OF UNEARNED WAGES; NOTICE REQUIRED. An employee's assignment of the employee's wages or a salary is not effective against the employee's employer in any suit for wages or salaries that are unearned at the time the assignment is executed unless the employer is given written notice of the assignment immediately after the execution of the assignment.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 9.17(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 63.002. EXEMPTION. This chapter does not affect Section 22.002, Education Code.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 9.17(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.